Utah statutes.
31A-22-605.5.   Application.

(1)  For purposes of this section "insurance mandate":

(a)  means a mandatory obligation with respect to coverage, benefits, or the number or types of providers imposed on policies of accident and health insurance; and

(b)  does not mean:

(i)  an administrative rule imposing a mandatory obligation with respect to coverage, benefits, or providers unless that mandatory obligation was specifically imposed on policies of accident and health insurance by statute; or

(ii)  an insurance mandate in an essential health benefits package imposed pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, and the Health Care Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-152, and federal rules related to their implementation.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 31A-1-103(3)(f), the following shall apply to health coverage offered to the state employees' risk pool under Subsection 49-20-202(1)(a):

(i)  any law enacted under this title that becomes effective after January 1, 2002, which provides for an insurance mandate for policies of accident and health insurance; and

(ii)  in accordance with Section 31A-22-613.5, disclosure requirements for coverage limitations.

(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 31A-1-103(3)(f), a health insurance mandate enacted under this title after January 1, 2012, shall apply to:

(i)  health coverage offered to the state employees' risk pool under Subsection 49-20-202(1)(a); and

(ii)  health coverage offered to public school districts, charter schools, and institutions of higher education under Subsection 49-20-201(1)(b).

(c)  If health coverage offered to the state employees' risk pool under Subsections 49-20-201(1)(b) and 49-20-202(1)(a) offers coverage in the same manner and to the same extent as the coverage required by an insurance mandate enacted under this title or coverage that is greater than the insurance mandate enacted under this title, the coverage offered to state employees under Subsections 49-20-201(1)(b) and 49-20-202(1)(a) will be considered in compliance with the insurance mandate.

(d)  The programs regulated under Subsections 49-20-201(1)(b) and 49-20-202(1)(a) shall report to the Retirement and Independent Entities Committee created under Section 63E-1-201 by November 30 of each year in which a mandate is enacted under the provisions of this section.  The report shall include the costs and benefits of the particular mandatory obligation.

(3) (a)  An insurance mandate for policies of accident and health insurance enacted under this title after January 1, 2012, shall apply to a health plan offered by a public school district, a charter school, or a state funded institution of higher education that is not insured through the Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program.

(b)  If an insurance mandate for policies of accident and health insurance is enacted under this title after January 1, 2012, the state shall determine whether each entity described in Subsections (2) and (3)(a) offers coverage in the same manner and to the same extent, or greater than the insurance coverage required in the mandate enacted after January 1, 2012.

(c)  Before enacting an insurance mandate, the state shall, for each entity that does not offer coverage in accordance with Subsection (3)(b):

(i)  determine the cost to the entity of implementing the insurance mandate; and

(ii)  appropriate money necessary to fund the full cost to the entity of implementing the insurance mandate.

